Arkansas, session 2025, SB396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 42, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-42-131. Nonresidents who graduated from Arkansas schools.
The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission is authorized to issue a
nonresident a hunting or fishing license or a combination license for the
same fee charged to an Arkansas resident for the same type of hunting or
fishing license or combination license if the nonresident:
(1) Graduated from a public, private, or home school in
Arkansas; and
(2) Is actively pursuing a higher education degree in another
state.
*CRH239*
03/06/2025 8:47:41 AM CRH239